Illinois, session 104th, SB1980.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Prompt Payment Act is amended by 5changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 540/7)  (from Ch. 127, par. 132.407)7    Sec. 7. Payments to subcontractors and material suppliers.8    (a) When a State official or agency responsible for 9administering a contract submits a voucher to the Comptroller 10for payment to a contractor, that State official or agency 11shall promptly make available electronically the voucher 12number, the date of the voucher, and the amount of the voucher. 13The State official or agency responsible for administering the 14contract shall provide subcontractors and material suppliers, 15known to the State official or agency, with instructions on 16how to access the electronic information.17    (a-5) When a contractor receives any payment, the 18contractor shall pay each subcontractor and material supplier 19electronically within 10 business days or 15 calendar days, 20whichever occurs earlier, or, if paid by a printed check, the 21printed check must be postmarked within 10 business days or 15 22calendar days, whichever occurs earlier, after receiving 23payment in proportion to the work completed by each   SB1980- 2 -LRB104 10646 HLH 20723 b1subcontractor and material supplier its application or pay 2estimate, plus interest received under this Act. When a 3contractor receives any payment, the contractor shall pay each 4lower-tiered subcontractor and material supplier and each 5subcontractor and material supplier shall make payment to its 6own respective subcontractors and material suppliers. If the 7contractor receives less than the full payment due under the 8public construction contract, the contractor shall be 9obligated to disburse on a pro rata basis those funds 10received, plus interest received under this Act, with the 11contractor, subcontractors and material suppliers each 12receiving a prorated portion based on the amount of payment 13each has earned. When, however, the State official or agency 14does not release the full payment due under the contract 15because there are specific areas of work or materials the 16State agency or official has determined are not suitable for 17payment, then those specific subcontractors or material 18suppliers involved shall not be paid for that portion of work 19rejected or deemed not suitable for payment and all other 20subcontractors and suppliers shall be paid based upon the 21amount of payment each has earned, plus interest received 22under this Act.23    (a-10) For construction contracts with the Department of 24Transportation or the Capital Development Board, the 25contractor, subcontractor, or material supplier, regardless of 26tier, shall not offset, decrease, or diminish payment or   SB1980- 3 -LRB104 10646 HLH 20723 b1payments that are due to its subcontractors or material 2suppliers without reasonable cause.3    A contractor, who refuses to make prompt payment within 10 4business days or 15 calendar days, whichever occurs earlier, 5after receiving payment, in whole or in part, shall provide to 6the subcontractor or material supplier and the public owner or 7its agent, a written notice of that refusal. The written 8notice shall be made by a contractor no later than 5 calendar 9days after payment is received by the contractor. The written 10notice shall identify the Department of Transportation's or 11the Capital Development Board's contract, any subcontract or 12material purchase agreement, a detailed reason for refusal, 13the value of the payment to be withheld, and the specific 14remedial actions required of the subcontractor or material 15supplier so that payment may be made. Written notice of 16refusal may be given in a form and method which is acceptable 17to the parties and public owner.18    (b) If the contractor, without reasonable cause, fails to 19make full payment of amounts due under subsection (a) to its 20subcontractors and material suppliers within 10 business days 21or 15 calendar days, whichever occurs earlier, after receipt 22of payment from the State official or agency, the contractor 23shall pay to its subcontractors and material suppliers, in 24addition to the payment due them, interest in the amount of 2% 25per month, calculated from the expiration of the 2610-business-day period or the 15-calendar-day period until   SB1980- 4 -LRB104 10646 HLH 20723 b1fully paid. This subsection shall further apply to any 2payments made by subcontractors and material suppliers to 3their subcontractors and material suppliers and to all 4payments made to lower tier subcontractors and material 5suppliers throughout the contracting chain.6        (1) If a contractor, without reasonable cause, fails 7    to make payment in full as provided in subsection (a-5) 8    within 10 business days or 15 calendar days, whichever 9    occurs earlier, after receipt of payment under the public 10    construction contract, any subcontractor or material 11    supplier to whom payments are owed may file a written 12    notice and request for administrative hearing with the 13    State official or agency setting forth the amount owed by 14    the contractor and the contractor's failure to timely pay 15    the amount owed. The written notice and request for 16    administrative hearing shall identify the public 17    construction contract, the contractor, and the amount 18    owed, and shall contain a sworn statement or attestation 19    to verify the accuracy of the notice. The notice and 20    request for administrative hearing shall be filed with the 21    State official for the public construction contract, with 22    a copy of the notice concurrently provided to the 23    contractor. Notice to the State official may be made by 24    certified or registered mail, messenger service, or 25    personal service, and must include proof of delivery to 26    the State official.   SB1980- 5 -LRB104 10646 HLH 20723 b1        (2) The State official or agency, within 15 calendar 2    days after receipt of a subcontractor's or material 3    supplier's written notice and request for administrative 4    hearing, shall hold a hearing convened by an 5    administrative law judge to determine whether the 6    contractor withheld payment, without reasonable cause, 7    from the subcontractors or material suppliers and what 8    amount, if any, is due to the subcontractors or material 9    suppliers, and the reasonable cause or causes asserted by 10    the contractor. The State official or agency shall provide 11    appropriate notice to the parties of the date, time, and 12    location of the hearing. Each contractor, subcontractor, 13    or material supplier has the right to be represented by 14    counsel at a hearing and to cross-examine witnesses and 15    challenge documents. Upon the request of the subcontractor 16    or material supplier and a showing of good cause, 17    reasonable continuances may be granted by the 18    administrative law judge. 19        (3) Upon a finding by the administrative law judge 20    that the contractor failed to make payment in full, 21    without reasonable cause, as provided in subsection 22    (a-10), then the administrative law judge shall, in 23    writing, order the contractor to pay the amount owed to 24    the subcontractors or material suppliers plus interest 25    within 15 calendar days after the order.26        (4) If a contractor fails to make full payment as   SB1980- 6 -LRB104 10646 HLH 20723 b1    ordered under paragraph (3) of this subsection (b) within 2    15 days after the administrative law judge's order, then 3    the contractor shall be barred from entering into a State 4    public construction contract for a period of one year 5    beginning on the date of the administrative law judge's 6    order.7        (5) If, on 2 or more occasions within a 8    3-calendar-year period, there is a finding by an 9    administrative law judge that the contractor failed to 10    make payment in full, without reasonable cause, and a 11    written order was issued to a contractor under paragraph 12    (3) of this subsection (b), then the contractor shall be 13    barred from entering into a State public construction 14    contract for a period of 6 months beginning on the date of 15    the administrative law judge's second written order, even 16    if the payments required under the orders were made in 17    full.18        (6) If a contractor fails to make full payment as 19    ordered under paragraph (4) of this subsection (b), the 20    subcontractor or material supplier may, within 30 days of 21    the date of that order, petition the State agency for an 22    order for reasonable attorney's fees and costs incurred in 23    the prosecution of the action under this subsection (b). 24    Upon that petition and taking of additional evidence, as 25    may be required, the administrative law judge may issue a 26    supplemental order directing the contractor to pay those   SB1980- 7 -LRB104 10646 HLH 20723 b1    reasonable attorney's fees and costs.2        (7) The written order of the administrative law judge 3    shall be final and appealable under the Administrative 4    Review Law.5    (b-5) On or before July 2021, the Department of 6Transportation shall publish on its website a searchable 7database that allows for queries for each active construction 8contract by the name of a subcontractor or the pay item such 9that each pay item is associated with either the prime 10contractor or a subcontractor. 11    (c) This Section shall not be construed to in any manner 12diminish, negate, or interfere with the 13contractor-subcontractor or contractor-material supplier 14relationship or commercially useful function.15    (d) This Section shall not preclude, bar, or stay the 16rights, remedies, and defenses available to the parties by way 17of the operation of their contract, purchase agreement, the 18Mechanics Lien Act, or the Public Construction Bond Act.19    (e) State officials and agencies may adopt rules as may be 20deemed necessary in order to establish the formal procedures 21required under this Section.22    (f) As used in this Section:23    "Payment" means the discharge of an obligation in money or 24other valuable consideration or thing delivered in full or 25partial satisfaction of an obligation to pay. "Payment" shall 26include interest paid pursuant to this Act.  SB1980- 8 -LRB104 10646 HLH 20723 b1    "Reasonable cause" may include, but is not limited to, 2unsatisfactory workmanship or materials; failure to provide 3documentation required by the contract, subcontract, or 4material purchase agreement; claims made against the 5Department of Transportation, the Capital Development Board, 6or the subcontractor pursuant to subsection (c) of Section 23 7of the Mechanics Lien Act or the Public Construction Bond Act; 8judgments, levies, garnishments, or other court-ordered 9assessments or offsets in favor of the Department of 10Transportation, the Capital Development Board, or other State 11agency entered against a subcontractor or material supplier. 12"Reasonable cause" does not include payments issued to the 13contractor that create a negative or reduced valuation pay 14application or pay estimate due to a reduction of contract 15quantities or work not performed or provided by the 16subcontractor or material supplier; the interception or 17withholding of funds for reasons not related to the 18subcontractor's or material supplier's work on the contract; 19anticipated claims or assessments of third parties not a party 20related to the contract or subcontract; asserted claims or 21assessments of third parties that are not authorized by court 22order, administrative tribunal, or statute. "Reasonable cause" 23further does not include the withholding, offset, or reduction 24of payment, in whole or in part, due to the assessment of 25liquidated damages or penalties assessed by the Department of 26Transportation or the Capital Development Board against the   SB1980- 9 -LRB104 10646 HLH 20723 b1contractor, unless the subcontractor's performance or supplied 2materials were the sole and proximate cause of the liquidated 3damage or penalty. 4(Source: P.A. 100-43, eff. 8-9-17; 100-376, eff. 1-1-18; 5100-863, eff. 8-14-18; 101-524, eff. 1-1-20.)